Maryland, session 2025, HB0881.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
5–310.
(a) (1) For a recipient that is an assistance unit that includes adults and
children or minor parents and children, the amount of assistance shall be designated as
follows:
(i) 75% for the child or children in the assistance unit; and
(ii) 25% for the adult member or members, or minor parent or
parents of the assistance unit.
– 1 –

Ch. 373 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) For a recipient that is an assistance unit that includes only adults or a
recipient who is a pregnant individual, 100% of the amount of assistance shall be
designated for the adult member or members or the pregnant individual.
(3) For applicants to the FIP, the amount of assistance shall be computed
by counting no more than 4 weeks of earned income in any month and disregarding 20% of
that earned income.
(4) (I) [The THROUGH FISCAL YEAR 2027, THE first $100 of] ANY
child support collected in a month [for one child and the first $200 of child support collected
in a month for two or more children] shall pass through to the family and shall be
disregarded in computing the amount of assistance.
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, THE GREATER OF $100 OF ANY
CHILD SUPPORT COLLECTED IN A MONTH FOR ONE CHILD AND $200 OF CHILD
SUPPORT COLLECTED IN A MONTH FOR TWO OR MORE CHILDREN OR 25% OF ANY
CHILD SUPPORT COLLECTED IN A MONTH SHALL PASS THROUGH TO THE FAMILY
AND SHALL BE DISREGARDED IN COMPUTING THE AMOUNT OF ASSISTANCE.
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029, THE GREATER OF $100 OF ANY
CHILD SUPPORT COLLECTED IN A MONTH FOR ONE CHILD AND $200 OF CHILD
SUPPORT COLLECTED IN A MONTH FOR TWO OR MORE CHILDREN OR 50% OF ANY
CHILD SUPPORT COLLECTED IN A MONTH SHALL PASS THROUGH TO THE FAMILY
AND SHALL BE DISREGARDED IN COMPUTING THE AMOUNT OF ASSISTANCE.
(IV) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030, THE GREATER OF $100 OF ANY
CHILD SUPPORT COLLECTED IN A MONTH FOR ONE CHILD AND $200 OF CHILD
SUPPORT COLLECTED IN A MONTH FOR TWO OR MORE CHILDREN OR 75% OF ANY
CHILD SUPPORT COLLECTED IN A MONTH SHALL PASS THROUGH TO THE FAMILY
AND SHALL BE DISREGARDED IN COMPUTING THE AMOUNT OF ASSISTANCE.
(V) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2031 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, ANY CHILD SUPPORT COLLECTED IN A MONTH SHALL PASS THROUGH
TO THE FAMILY AND SHALL BE DISREGARDED IN COMPUTING THE AMOUNT OF
ASSISTANCE.
(5) For eligible recipients who obtain unsubsidized employment, the
amount of assistance shall be computed by counting no more than 4 weeks of earned income
in any month and disregarding 35% of that earned income.
5–501.
(a) (1) The Department may implement a Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program in accordance with the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 373
(2) The Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program shall include:
(i) a Restaurant Meals Program in accordance with § 5–505 of this
subtitle; and
(ii) a Heat and Eat Program in accordance with § 5–506 of this
subtitle.
(b) The State shall bear the nonfederal portion of the administrative costs of the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program for each county.
(c) Each local department shall administer the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program:
(1) under the supervision and control of the Department; and
(2) in accordance with the regulations of the Department and federal law.
(d) If a household includes an individual who is at least 60 years old and receives
a federally funded benefit in an amount less than $50 per month under the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program, the State shall provide a supplement to increase the total
benefit to $50 per month.
(E) A LOCAL DEPARTMENT MAY NOT CONSIDER ANY CHILD SUPPORT
COLLECTED BY A HOUSEHOLD WHEN COMPUTING THE AMOUNT OF SUPPLEMENTAL
BENEFITS PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION OR § 5–501.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –